hr-HR: Vrsta preljeva za salatu: Na bazi mlaćenice; Kremasto; Na bazi voća; Glazura / gusta redukcija; Mješavina u prahu; Raspršivač/maglica; Na bazi tahinija; Vinaigrette (na bazi ulja); Na bazi jogurta; Ostalo
es: Tipo de aderezo para ensaladas: A base de suero de mantequilla; Cremoso; A base de frutas; Glaseado/reducción espesa; Mezcla en polvo; Aerosol/spray; A base de tahini; Vinagreta (a base de aceite); A base de yogur; Otro
zh-TW: 沙拉醬類型: 白脫牛奶基底; 濃郁型; 水果基底; 濃縮醬; 粉包混合; 噴霧型; 芝麻醬基底; 油醋醬 (油基底); 優格基底; 其他
it: Tipo di condimento per insalata: A base di latticello; Cremoso; A base di frutta; Glassa/riduzione densa; Miscela in polvere; Spray/nebulizzato; A base di tahina; Vinaigrette (a base d’olio); A base di yogurt; Altro
tr: Salata sosu türü: Yayık altı suyu bazlı; Kremalı; Meyve bazlı; Glazür/koyu çektirme; Toz karışım; Sprey/püskürtme; Tahin bazlı; Vinaigrette (yağ bazlı); Yoğurt bazlı; Diğer
da: Type salatdressing: Kærnemælksbaseret; Cremet; Frugtbaseret; Glasering/tyk reduktion; Pulverblanding; Spray/mist; Tahinbaseret; Vinaigrette (oliebaseret); Yoghurtbaseret; Andet
fi: Salaatinkastikkeen tyyppi: Piimäpohjainen; Kermainen; Hedelmäpohjainen; Lasite / paksu reduktio; Jauhesekoitus; Suihke; Tahinipohjainen; Vinaigrette (öljypohjainen); Jogurttipohjainen; Muu
nb: Type salatdressing: Kjernemelkbasert; Kremet; Fruktbasert; Glasur / tykk reduksjon; Pulvermiks; Spray; Tahinibasert; Vinaigrette (oljebasert); Yoghurtbasert; Annet
nl: Saladedressing type: Op basis van karnemelk; Romig; Op basis van fruit; Glazuur/dikke reductie; Poedermix; Spray/nevel; Op basis van tahin; Vinaigrette (op basis van olie); Op basis van yoghurt; Overige
de: Art des Salatdressings: Buttermilchbasiert; Cremig; Fruchtbasiert; Glasur/Dicke Reduktion; Pulvermischung; Spray/Nebel; Tahinibasiert; Vinaigrette (ölbasiert); Joghurtbasiert; Sonstige
pt-PT: Tipo de molho para salada: À base de leitelho; Cremoso; À base de fruta; Glacê/redução espessa; Mistura em pó; Spray/vaporizador; À base de tahini; Vinagrete (à base de óleo); À base de iogurte; Outro
pt-BR: Molho para salada tipo: À base de leitelho; Cremoso; À base de frutas; Glaze/redução espessa; Mistura em pó; Spray/névoa; À base de tahine; Vinagrete (à base de óleo); À base de iogurte; Outros
th: ประเภทของน้ำสลัด: ส่วนผสมหลักคือบัตเตอร์มิลค์; ครีมมี่; ส่วนผสมหลักคือผลไม้; เกลซ/ซอสเคี่ยวข้น; ผงผสม; สเปรย์/ละออง; ส่วนผสมหลักคือตาฮินี; วินิเกรต(ส่วนผสมหลักคือน้ำมัน); ส่วนผสมหลักคือโยเกิร์ต; อื่นๆ
el: Τύπος σάλτσας για σαλάτα: Με βάση το βουτυρόγαλα; Κρεμώδες; Με βάση τα φρούτα; Γλάσο/παχύρρευστο; Μίγμα σε σκόνη; Σπρέι/mist; Με βάση το ταχίνι; Βινεγκρέτ (με βάση το λάδι); Με βάση το γιαούρτι; Άλλο
ja: サラダドレッシングの種類: バターミルクベース; クリーミー; フルーツベース; グレーズ / とろみづけ; パウダーミックス; スプレー / ミスト; タヒニベース; ビネグレット (オイルベース); ヨーグルトベース; その他
en: Salad dressing type: Buttermilk-based; Creamy; Fruit-based; Glaze/thick reduction; Powder mix; Spray/mist; Tahini-based; Vinaigrette (oil-based); Yogurt-based; Other
cs: Typ zálivky na salát: Na bázi podmáslí; Krémové; Na bázi ovoce; Glazura / hustá redukce; Prášková směs; Sprej/mlha; Na bázi tahini; Vinaigrette (na bázi oleje); Na bázi jogurtu; Jiné
sv: Typ av salladsdressing: Kärnmjölksbaserad; Krämig; Fruktbaserad; Glasyr/tjock reduktion; Pulvermix; Spray/mist; Tahinibaserad; Vinaigrette (oljebaserad); Yoghurtbaserad; Övrigt
fr: Type d’assaisonnement pour salade: À base de babeurre; Crémeuse; À base de fruits; Glaçage / Réduction épaisse; Mélange en poudre; Vaporisateur / Brume; À base de tahini; Vinaigrette (à base d’huile); À base de yaourt; Autre
vi: Loại nước sốt salad: Từ bơ sữa; Dạng kem; Từ trái cây; Dạng sệt/cô đặc; Hỗn hợp bột; Dạng xịt/phun sương; Từ xốt bơ vừng (Tahini); Vinaigrette (từ dầu); Từ sữa chua; Khác
ro-RO: Tip de dressing pentru salată: Pe bază de lapte bătut; Cremoasă; Pe bază de fructe; Glazură/reducție groasă; Mix sub formă de pudră; Spray/pulverizator; Pe bază de tahini; Vinaigretă (pe bază de ulei); Pe bază de iaurt; Altele
ko: 샐러드 드레싱 종류: 버터밀크 베이스; 크리미; 과일 베이스; 글레이즈/걸쭉한 졸임; 분말 믹스; 스프레이/미스트; 타히니 베이스; 비네그레트(오일 베이스); 요거트 베이스; 기타
hu: Salátaöntet típusa: Író alapú; Krémes; Gyümölcs alapú; Máz/sűrű redukció; Porkeverék; Spray/permet; Tahini alapú; Vinaigrette (olaj alapú); Joghurt alapú; Egyéb
sk-SK: Typ šalátového dresingu: Na báze cmaru; Krémový; Na báze ovocia; Poleva/hustá redukcia; Prášková zmes; Sprej/hmla; Na báze tahini; Vinaigrette (na báze oleja); Na báze jogurtu; Iné
zh-CN: 沙拉酱类型: 酪乳基; 奶油状; 水果基; 釉汁/浓缩汁; 混合粉; 喷雾型; 芝麻酱基; 油醋汁（油基）; 酸奶基; 其他
bg-BG: Вид дресинг за салата: На основата на мътеница; Кремообразен; На плодова основа; Глазура/гъста редукция; Суха смес (на прах); Спрей; На основата на тахан; Винегрет (на маслена основа); На основата на кисело мляко; Друго
ru: Тип салатной заправки: На основе пахты; Сливочная; На фруктовой основе; Глазурь/густой соус; Порошковая смесь; Спрей; На основе тахини; Винегрет (на основе масла); На основе йогурта; Другая
lt-LT: Salotų padažo tipas: Pasukų pagrindu; Kreminis; Vaisių pagrindu; Glazūra / tirštas padažas; Miltelių mišinys; Purškiamas; Tachinio pagrindu; Vinigretas (aliejaus pagrindu); Jogurto pagrindu; Kita
pl: Typ sosu sałatkowego: Na bazie maślanki; Kremowy; Na bazie owoców; Glazura/Gęsta redukcja; Mieszanka w proszku; Spray/Mgiełka; Na bazie tahini; Winaigret (na bazie oleju); Na bazie jogurtu; Inny
sl-SI: Vrsta solatnega preliva: Na osnovi pinjenca; Kremno; Na sadni osnovi; Glazura/gosta redukcija; Mešanica v prahu; Pršilo; Na osnovi tahinija; Vinaigrette (na oljni osnovi); Na jogurtovi osnovi; Drugo